District of Columbia statutes.
1-121

Purpose.

The purpose of this initiative is to propose to the registered qualified electors of the District of Columbia the question of calling a statehood constitutional convention for the purpose of forming a constitution and otherwise providing a process for a major portion of the territory now known as the District of Columbia to be admitted in the Union as a state on equal footing with the other states. The acts of the convention shall be submitted for ratification by the people, as provided for in this initiative.

Mar. 10, 1981, D.C. Law 3-171, § 2, 27 DCR 4732
Oct. 8, 1981, D.C. Law 4-35, § 2(a), 28 DCR 3376
Constitution of State of New Columbia, see New Columbia Const., Art. 1, § 1 et seq. in Volume 1.
1981 Ed., § 1-111.
Constitution approved: The Constitution developed by the Statehood Constitutional Convention, entitled the “Constitution of the State of New Columbia”, was submitted to the electors of the District of Columbia for ratification on November 2, 1982. The results of the voting, certified by the Board of Elections and Ethics on November 10, 1982, were 61,405 for the Constitution and 54,964 against the Constitution.